Connecticut, session 2026, SB00399.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (e) of section 46a-83 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(e) If the complaint is not resolved after the mandatory mediation
conference, the complainant, the respondent or the commission may at
any time after such conference and before a draft investigative report is
issued request early legal intervention. If a request for early legal
intervention is made, a commission legal counsel shall determine not
later than ninety days after the date of the request whether the
complaint should be (1) heard pursuant to section 46a-84, (2) processed
pursuant to subsection (f) of this section, or (3) released from the
jurisdiction of the commission. In making such determination,
commission legal counsel may hold additional proceedings and may
utilize and direct commission staff. If a commission legal counsel
determines that the complaint should be processed pursuant to
subsection (f) of this section, the commission legal counsel may
recommend that the investigator make a finding of no reasonable cause.
The investigator shall make such a finding unless the investigator
believes the commission legal counsel made a mistake of fact. If the
LCO 1 of 5

Substitute Bill No. 399
investigator intends to make a finding of reasonable cause after the
commission legal counsel recommends otherwise, the investigator shall
consult with the commission legal counsel.
Sec. 2. Section 46a-94a of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) The commission, any respondent or any complainant, aggrieved
by a final order of a presiding officer, may appeal to the Superior Court
in accordance with section 4-183. Any complainant may appeal to the
Superior Court in accordance with section 4-183 if the complainant is
aggrieved by (1) the dismissal of his or her complaint by the commission
for failure to attend a mandatory mediation session as provided in
subsection (m) of section 46a-83, (2) a finding of no reasonable cause as
provided in subsection (g) of section 46a-83, or (3) rejection of
reconsideration as provided in subsection (h) of section 46a-83.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, a
complainant may not appeal the dismissal of his or her complaint if he
or she has been granted a release pursuant to section 46a-101.
(c) The commission on its own motion may, whenever justice so
requires, reopen any [matter] complaint previously closed. [, provided
such matter has not been appealed to the Superior Court pursuant to
subsection (a) of this section.] Notice of such reopening shall be given to
all parties. A complainant or respondent may, for good cause shown, in
the interest of justice, apply in writing for the reopening of a previously
closed proceeding, provided such application is filed with the executive
director of the commission within two years of the [commission’s]
commission's final decision and the complainant has not (1) [not] been
issued a release of jurisdiction pursuant to section 46a-83a, as amended
by this act, and filed a civil action; [, or] (2) requested and received a
release of jurisdiction from the commission pursuant to section 46a-101;
(3) been issued a release of jurisdiction pursuant to subsection (c) of
section 46a-83 and filed a civil action; (4) been issued a final decision at
the commission's office of public hearings; or (5) appealed the final
LCO 2 of 5

Substitute Bill No. 399
agency decision to the Superior Court.
(d) The standards for reopening a [matter may include, but are not
limited to] complaint are as follows: (1) A material mistake of fact or law
has occurred; (2) the finding is arbitrary or capricious; (3) the finding is
clearly erroneous in view of the reliable, probative and substantial
evidence on the whole record; [and] or (4) new evidence has been
discovered which materially affects the merits of the case and which, for
good reasons, was not presented during the investigation.
Sec. 3. Subsection (c) of section 46a-55 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(c) The executive director may, within available appropriations,
assign a commission legal counsel to bring a civil action concerning an
alleged discriminatory practice, in accordance with this subsection, in
lieu of an administrative hearing pursuant to section 46a-84, when the
executive director determines that a civil action is in the public interest
and if the parties to the administrative hearing mutually agree, in
writing, to the bringing of such civil action by commission legal counsel.
The commission legal counsel shall bring such a civil action in the
Superior Court not later than ninety days following the date the
commission legal counsel notifies the parties of the executive director's
determination. Such civil action may be served by certified mail and
shall not be subject to the provisions of section 46a-100 [,] or 46a-101. [or
46a-102.] The jurisdiction of the Superior Court in an action brought
under this subsection shall be limited to such claims, counterclaims,
defenses or the like that could be presented at an administrative hearing
before the commission, had the complaint remained with the
commission for disposition. A complainant may intervene as a matter
of right without permission of the court or the parties. The civil action
shall be tried to the court without a jury. If the commission legal counsel
determines that the interests of the state will not be adversely affected,
the complainant or attorney for the complainant shall present all or part
of the case in support of the complaint. The court may grant any relief
LCO 3 of 5

Substitute Bill No. 399
available under section 46a-104. Where the Superior Court finds that a
respondent has committed a discriminatory practice, the court shall
grant the commission its fees and costs and award the commission a
civil penalty, not exceeding ten thousand dollars, provided such
discriminatory practice has been established by clear and convincing
evidence, which shall be payable to the commission and used by the
commission to advance the public interest in eliminating discrimination.
Sec. 4. Subsection (b) of section 46a-82b of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(b) If the commission fails to issue a determination of reasonable
cause or no reasonable cause on any such complaint not later than
January 1, 1997, the executive director of the commission shall issue
forthwith a release of the complaint from the commission, allowing the
complainant to bring a civil action. Upon receipt of a release pursuant
100 to this section, the complainant may bring a civil action in accordance
101 with the provisions of sections 46a-100, 46a-101, 46a-103 and 46a-104. [,
102 notwithstanding the statute of limitations pursuant to section 46a-102.]
103 Sec. 5. Section 46a-83a of the general statutes is repealed and the
104 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
105 If a complaint is dismissed for failure to accept full relief pursuant to
106 subsection (m) of section 46a-83, and the complainant does not request
107 reconsideration of such dismissal as provided in subsection (h) of
108 section 46a-83, the executive director shall issue a release of jurisdiction
109 and the complainant may, within ninety days of receipt of the release
110 from the commission, bring an action in accordance with sections 46a-
111 100, [and 46a-102 to 46a-104, inclusive] 46a-103 and 46a-104.
112 Sec. 6. Section 46a-102 of the general statutes is repealed. (Effective
113 October 1, 2026)
LCO 4 of 5

Substitute Bill No. 399
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 46a-83(e)
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 46a-94a
Sec. 3 October 1, 2026 46a-55(c)
Sec. 4 October 1, 2026 46a-82b(b)
Sec. 5 October 1, 2026 46a-83a
Sec. 6 October 1, 2026 Repealer section
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Section 2(d), "matter" was bracketed and replaced with "complaint"
for internal consistency.
JUD Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 5 of 5